North Carolina statutes. Chapter 85A. Bail Bondsmen and Runners.
§§ 85A-1 through 85A-34.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 85C-1

through 85C-41.

Editor’s Note.

This Chapter was rewritten by Session Laws 1975, c. 619, s. 1, effective October 1, 1975, and was recodified as Chapter 85C.

G.S. 85C-1

through 85C-41 have been recodified as Article 71 of Chapter 58,

G.S. 58-71-1

et seq., pursuant to Session Laws 1987, c. 752, s. 9, as amended by Session Laws 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 975, s. 34.

Former G.S. 85A-34 was amended by Session Laws 1975, c. 16, which made the Chapter applicable to Burke County, and by Session Laws 1975, c. 560, which made the Chapter applicable to Carteret, Craven, Forsyth, Pitt and Pamlico Counties.